Hawaii statutes.
§633-28 Small claims, no appeal; appearance
by whom. (a) Actions shall be commenced and conducted in the small claims
division of the district court as provided by the rules of court. The clerk of
the court, at the request of an individual, shall prepare the papers required
to be filed in an action in the court, but the clerk's services in the
preparation of these papers shall not be available to a corporation,
partnership, or association, or to any individual proprietorship. The mode of
service shall be:

(1) As provided by law or rule of court for cases in
the district courts; provided that for any small claims action, service may be
made by one of the parties to the action by means of personal service to the
other parties, on the condition that:

(A) The party being served signs that party's
name to indicate actual receipt of service; or

(B) A competent witness, who is not an
employee, family member, or agent of the plaintiff appears at a hearing on the
matter or provides a notarized affidavit testifying that personal service on
the party sought to be served was accomplished in the witness' presence;

(2) As to actions arising under paragraphs (1) and
(3) of section 633-27(a), by registered mail or by certified mail with return
receipt signed by the addressee showing delivery within the circuit; or

(3) As to actions arising under paragraph (2) of
section 633-27(a), by registered mail or by certified mail with return receipt
signed by the addressee showing delivery at any place within or without the
State.

There shall be no appeal from a judgment of the
small claims division, but the court, sitting as the small claims division, may
alter or set aside any judgment as provided by the rules of court.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law
requiring the licensing of practitioners, any person, with the approval of the
court, may appear on behalf of the person or another person in the small claims
division of the district court; provided that, in cases in the small claims
division of the district court involving disagreement between landlord and
tenant about the security deposit in a residential landlord-tenant
relationship, licensed practitioners are prohibited from appearing on behalf of
another person. The services of an unlicensed person appearing under this
subsection shall be without compensation, either by way of direct fee,
contingent fee, or otherwise. In the event representation services are
rendered for compensation, this subsection is inapplicable and the rendering of
the services constitutes the unlawful practice of law, except as otherwise
provided. [L 1970, c 182, pt of §1; am L 1971, c 144, §22; am L 1972, c 142,
§2; am L 1983, c 249, §4; gen ch 1985; am L 1997, c 138, §2; am L 2005, c 12,
§2]

Rules of Court

Appeal, see RSCD rule 12.

Service, see RSCD rules 3, 5.

Case Notes

Appeal is purely statutory, and under this section there is
no appeal from judgment of small claims division. 60 H. 52, 587 P.2d 807
(1978).

Mandamus cannot be used to perform
the office of an appeal. 60 H. 52, 587 P.2d 807 (1978).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next